Maryland, session 2026, HB0152.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
4A–508.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO ANY FINANCIAL INSTITUTION OPERATING IN
THE STATE.
(B) CONSUMER WIRE TRANSFERS INVOLVING ELECTRONIC FUNDS
TRANSFERS MADE ANCILLARY TO BANK–TO–BANK TRANSFERS VIA A WIRE SERVICE
SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF THE FEDERAL ELECTRONIC FUNDS
TRANSFER ACT OF 1978 (U.S.C. 1693 ET SEQ.).
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0152*

HOUSE BILL 152
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That if this Act is held to be
inapplicable to federally chartered financial institutions, or financial institutions operating
in the State that are chartered outside the State, for any reason in a court of competent
jurisdiction, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.